Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.633

Authority of director to attend meetings of the board.

The director may attend a meeting of the board of a credit union if the director believes that attendance at the meeting is necessary for the welfare of the credit union, or the purposes of this chapter, or if the board has requested the director's attendance. The director shall provide reasonable notice to the board before attending a meeting.

[ 1997 c 397 s 59; 1994 c 92 s 217; 1984 c 31 s 68. Formerly RCW 31.12.665.]